Washington statutes.
RCW 35.18.210

Mayor pro tempore.

In case of the mayor's absence, a mayor pro tempore selected by the members of the council from among their number shall act as mayor during the continuance of the absence.

[ 1969 c 101 s 2; 1965 c 7 s 35.18.210. Prior: 1955 c 337 s 11; prior: 1943 c 271 s 8, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 9198-17, part.]